Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 7 Veterans Affairs Guardians

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

29-7-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Benefits” means all moneys paid or payable by the United States through the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

“Department” means the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, its predecessors, or its successors.

“Estate” means income on hand and assets acquired partially or wholly with income.

“Income” means moneys received from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and revenue or profit from any property wholly or partially acquired therewith.

“Person” means an individual, a partnership, a corporation, or an association.

“Secretary” means the secretary of veterans affairs of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the secretary’s successor.

“VA guardian” means a person appointed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

“Ward” means a beneficiary of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-2.
Involvement of secretary in proceedings for appointment or discharge of VA guardian; jurisdiction; notification to United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

The secretary shall be a party in interest in any proceedings for the appointment or discharge of a VA guardian and in any proceedings involving the administration of the estate of the ward. Written notice of the time and place for hearing on any petition or pleading or in connection with any proceeding pertaining to a VA guardianship pursuant to this chapter shall be given by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the office of the department having jurisdiction over the area in which the ward resides. The notice shall include a copy of the petition or other pleadings and shall be given so as to arrive in due course of mailing not less than 15 days before the date of a hearing or other proceedings, unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

In any proceeding involving a guardianship or conservatorship established pursuant to any other chapter of this title, the office of the department having jurisdiction over the area in which the ward resides may, by giving written notice to the court having jurisdiction over such proceedings and to the guardian or conservator or proposed guardian or conservator, become a party in interest as to the guardianship or conservatorship or proposed guardianship or conservatorship and shall thereafter be entitled to notice as if a guardianship or conservatorship was originally established under this chapter.

The court shall mail to the department office a copy of each order entered in any VA guardianship or other guardianship or conservatorship proceeding wherein the secretary is an interested party.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-3.
Requirement of secretary that guardian be appointed.

Whenever, pursuant to any law of the United States or regulation of the department, the secretary requires, prior to payment of benefits, that a VA guardian be appointed for a ward, the appointment shall be made in the manner provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-4.
Prima-facie evidence of necessity for appointment of VA guardian.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a VA guardian for a mentally incompetent ward, a certificate of the secretary or the secretary’s duly authorized representative stating that such individual has been rated incompetent by the department on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the department and that the appointment of a VA guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due such ward by the department shall be prima-facie evidence of the necessity for the appointment of a VA guardian. The courts are authorized to appoint a VA guardian for an incompetent ward entitled to any benefits which may be payable to a ward by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-5.
Appointment of VA guardians for minors.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a VA guardian for a minor, a certificate of the secretary or the secretary’s authorized representative setting forth the age of the minor as shown by the records of the department and the fact that the appointment of a VA guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due the minor by the department shall be prima-facie evidence of the necessity for the appointment of a VA guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-6.
Notice.

Upon a petition for the appointment of a VA guardian, notice shall be given to the department office having jurisdiction over the area in which the ward resides, to the proposed ward, and to two adult relatives of the proposed ward by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery by the court. If two adult relatives of the proposed ward cannot be located, notice to one adult relative shall be sufficient. If no adult relative can be located, the court shall give notice of the petition in the newspaper in which legal advertisements of the county in which the ward resides are published once a week for two weeks. After notice has been given or published, the letters of guardianship may, in the discretion of the court, be granted to the petitioner or to some other suitable person. If all parties entitled to notice waive further notice and consent to the notice instanter, the court may, in its discretion, grant letters of guardianship instanter to the petitioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-7.
Petitioning for appointment of VA guardian; requirements of petitions; preferences for appointment.

A petition for the appointment of a VA guardian may be filed in the court having jurisdiction by or on behalf of the department or any person designated by the secretary or the secretary’s representative.

The petition shall set forth:

The name, age, and place of residence of the ward;

The names and places of residence of the nearest two adult relatives, if known;

The fact that the ward is entitled to receive moneys payable by or through the department;

The amount of money then due and the amount of probable future payments;

The name and address of the person or institution, if any, having actual custody of the ward;

In the case of a mentally incompetent ward, that the ward has been rated incompetent on examination by the department in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the department; and

The name and address of the person or institution sought to be appointed as VA guardian of the ward and the relationship, if any, of the proposed VA guardian to the ward.

Preferences for appointment of a VA guardian shall be as provided in Code Section 29-5-3.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-8.
Qualifications of VA guardian.

Before making an appointment under this chapter, the court hearing the petition shall be satisfied that the VA guardian whose appointment is sought is a fit and proper person to be appointed. The nomination of a person by the department shall be prima-facie evidence of the person’s fitness. A qualified individual shall ordinarily be preferred for appointment as VA guardian, but the court may, in the court’s discretion, appoint any qualified person as VA guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-9.
Individuals or entities eligible to serve as VA guardians; discharge or guardian; requirements pending discharge.

The following persons and entities may serve as VA guardians subject to the restrictions listed:

An individual deemed fit and proper by the court may be a VA guardian of that individual’s children, parents, and grandparents without limitation;

A bank or trust company doing business in this state may serve as a VA guardian under this chapter for an unlimited number of beneficiaries;

A person appointed while serving as county guardian in any county in this state may serve as a VA guardian under this chapter for an unlimited number of beneficiaries; or

Any other person, provided that any person who is currently serving as the VA guardian for ten or more wards must so state in that person’s petition to be appointed as the VA guardian for additional wards, and provided, further, the department shall have the right to direct the court in writing to deny the petition.

Upon presentation of a petition by the department alleging that the VA guardian is acting in a fiduciary capacity in violation of this Code section and requesting the discharge of that VA guardian, the court upon proof substantiating the petition shall:

Require a final accounting immediately from a sufficient number of VA guardianships, in reverse chronological order, to bring the VA guardian within compliance of this Code section;

Require final settlements of accounts immediately on the VA guardianships described in paragraph (1) of this subsection; and

Discharge the VA guardian in cases as the court deems proper.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-10.
Bond requirements; discharge of surety on bond.

A bank or trust company doing business in this state shall not be required to file a bond for any VA guardianship unless required by the department.

Any other person serving as a VA guardian shall execute and file a bond, to be approved by the court, in an amount not less than the sum of the value of the estate, other than real property, at the time of the last accounting and funds estimated to become payable during the ensuing year, which bond shall be a security bond made by a solvent and acceptable surety company in the form required for bonds of guardians or conservators appointed under the general guardianship or conservatorship laws and shall be conditioned as are such bonds. After each annual accounting, the court shall review the amount of the bond and shall order such increase or decrease as shall be warranted by the accounting. No reduction in the bond amount shall affect the liability of the surety for past waste or misconduct of the VA guardian.

A surety on a bond posted pursuant to this Code section shall not be relieved from liability merely because of the expiration of the term of the bond but shall be subject to provisions of law for discharge of a surety applicable to other bonds.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-11.
Investment of surplus funds.

Every VA guardian shall invest the surplus funds of the ward’s estate in such securities or property as authorized under the laws of this state but only upon prior order of the court; except that the funds may be invested, without prior court authorization, in direct unconditional interest-bearing obligations of this state or of the United States or in obligations the interest and principal of which are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States. A signed duplicate or certified copy of the petition for authority to invest surplus funds shall be furnished the proper area office of the department, and notice of hearing on the petition shall be given said office in the case of a VA guardian’s account.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-12.
Expenditure of ward’s estate; insurance; title to new property.

A VA guardian shall not apply any portion of the estate of the ward for the support, maintenance, or education of any person other than the ward, the ward’s spouse, and the children of the ward who are legally dependent on the ward, except upon order of the court after a hearing, notice of which has been given by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the department not less than 30 days prior to a hearing on the petition, unless the department consents in writing to the petition, in which case no hearing need be had.

No VA guardian shall name himself or herself as beneficiary of any insurance policy which insures the life of the ward. As to any insurance policy that is purchased after establishment of the VA guardianship where premiums are or have been paid from benefits, the VA guardian shall ensure that the beneficiary named is the estate of the ward.

All property of a ward having a VA guardian which is purchased with benefits shall be titled in the name of the current VA guardian or any successor VA guardian for (name of ward ), a beneficiary of the department, further indicating the fact of VA guardianship and the name of the beneficiary on any documents of title. Any such assets which should be prudently insured shall be insured with a policy of insurance denominated in the same manner.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-13.
Annual accounting requirements.

Every VA guardian shall file with the court annually, in the same manner as provided under the general law for conservators, a full, true, and accurate accounting, on oath, of all moneys received by the VA guardian and disbursements of all moneys, showing the balance in the VA guardian’s hands at the date of the accounting and how it is invested. The VA guardian shall list in each accounting all the investments of the ward’s funds, showing the amount of each investment, the date made, the interest rate, the date of maturity, the dates and amounts of any liquidations, and the dates and amounts of interest payments. A certified copy of each of accounting filed with the court shall be sent by the court within ten days after the accounting is filed to the office of the department having jurisdiction over the area in which the court is located. Each accounting shall include a computation of commissions allowed and taken during the period covered by the accounting. No accounting shall be allowed or admitted to record for a period of 60 days following the date of filing the accounting.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-14.
Failure to file an annual accounting.

If any VA guardian fails to file the accounting required by Code Section 29-7-13, the failure shall be grounds for removal. If any VA guardian fails to file any accounting within 30 days after demand is made by the court to do so, the court shall notify the surety for the VA guardian of the failure by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery. Thereafter, on motion of any interested party, including the surety, or on its own motion, the court may enter an order removing the VA guardian without further notice or hearing. Every VA guardian who fails or refuses to file the accounting by the due date shall receive no commission or compensation for any service during that year unless by special order of the court the VA guardian is exonerated from all fault.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-15.
Compensation for guardian; reimbursement for premium on bond.

As compensation for service, a VA guardian shall earn a commission of 5 percent on all income of the ward coming into the VA guardian’s hands during any months while the VA guardian serves. If the ward receives at least $350.00 per month, the minimum fee shall be $35.00 per month.

In the event the ward’s monthly service connected disability compensation payment from the department is discontinued or suspended, the VA guardian, subject to court approval which shall be given unless it appears to the court that the estate is unfairly prejudiced or the payment would be a manifest injustice, shall be entitled to 5 percent additional commission on all sums paid out by the VA guardian from the time the disability compensation payment is discontinued or suspended until the time the disability compensation payment is resumed.

In the event that extraordinary services are rendered by the VA guardian, the court, upon petition and after hearing thereon, may authorize additional compensation payable from the estate of the ward. Notice of the petition and hearing shall be given by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the department office having jurisdiction over the area in which the ward resides not less than 30 days prior to the hearing on the petition. No compensation shall be allowed on the corpus of an estate received from a previous VA guardian.

A VA guardian shall be allowed to pay from the ward’s estate reasonable premiums for any corporate surety on the VA guardian’s bond.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 18/SB 534.

29-7-16.
Discharge of VA guardian; role of county guardian.

A VA guardian, upon filing a petition and making satisfactory accounting, shall be discharged when the ward dies, reaches the age of majority, or is declared competent by the department or the court.

A county guardian who ceases to serve as county guardian continues to serve as a VA guardian at the pleasure of the court for which the VA guardian formerly served as county guardian. The court may at any time require the VA guardian’s final accounting and discharge as to any or all VA guardianships which the VA guardian accepted as county guardian, whereupon the court shall appoint as successor VA guardian the new county guardian or other person as shall be requested by the department. A former county guardian may file a petition with the court, a copy of which shall be served by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery upon the area office of the department, together with the VA guardian’s final accounting, as to any or all VA guardianships; whereupon the court shall appoint as the VA guardian’s successor the new county guardian or other person as shall be designated by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-17.
Application of other laws; right to appeal.

Except where inconsistent with this chapter, the general guardianship and conservatorship laws of this state and the laws establishing the practice in such matters, including the rights of appeal, shall be applicable to wards and their estates governed by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-7-18.
Construction.

This chapter shall be construed liberally to secure the beneficial intents and purposes thereof and shall apply only to beneficiaries of the department who are entitled to benefits from the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-7-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.